Wyoming, session 2026, HB0159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-39-125 and 21-3-601 are created to
read:

1-39-125. Liability; student expression at schools;
waiver.
HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411

(a) A governmental entity is liable for damages
resulting from a violation of W.S. 21-3-601 in accordance
with W.S. 21-3-601(g).

(b) A school as defined by W.S. 21-3-601(a)(i) waives
immunity under the eleventh amendment to the United States
constitution and consents to suit in a federal court for
lawsuits arising under W.S. 21-3-601. A school that
violates W.S. 21-3-601 shall not be immune from suit or
liability for the violation.

ARTICLE 6
SAFEGUARDING FREE EXPRESSION

21-3-601. Protections for student speech and
expression; definitions; remedies.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "School" means any school specified in W.S.
21-3-101 and shall not include privately run schools;

HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
(ii) "Student" means a person who is enrolled in
a school on a full-time or part-time basis.

(b) No student shall be discriminated against or
penalized by a school for engaging in religious, political
or ideological speech or expressing a religious, political
or ideological viewpoint in the same time, place and manner
and to the same extent that other similarly situated
students may engage in speech or express views at school.

(c) A student may engage in protected speech or
expression at school, including but not limited to the
following:

(i) Expressing a religious, political or
ideological viewpoint on the topic or subject of discussion
or study inside of a class or during an instruction period;

(ii) Expressing religious, political or
ideological viewpoints in a homework assignment, artwork,
presentation or other written or oral assignment without
discrimination or academic penalty based on the religious,
political or ideological content of the student's
HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
submission. The student's work shall be assessed by
ordinary academic standards of substance and relevance and
against other legitimate pedagogical concerns identified by
the school;

(iii) Organizing religious, political or
ideological gatherings before school, during instructional
time and after school to the same extent and with the same
access to school facilities as other student-initiated
gatherings are permitted;

(iv) Wearing clothing, accessories and jewelry
that display religious, political or ideological messages
or religious, political or ideological symbols in the same
manner and to the same extent that other students are
permitted to wear clothing, accessories and jewelry that
display messages and symbols.

(d) One (1) or more students may organize religious,
political or ideological clubs or organizations before,
during and after school to the same extent and with the
same access to school facilities and to all benefits and
HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
privileges that are afforded to other clubs and
organizations authorized by the school.

(e) Subject to subsection (f) of this section, no
school shall discriminate against a student club or
organization because of:

(i) The religious, political or ideological
viewpoints expressed by the club, organization or the
students within the club or organization;

(ii) Any requirement that the leaders or members
of the club or organization affirm and adhere to the
organization's sincerely held beliefs, comply with the
organization's standards of conduct or further the club's
or organization's mission or purpose, as defined by the
student club or organization.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent a school from prohibiting, limiting or restricting:

(i) Expression that the first amendment to the
United States constitution does not protect;
HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411

(ii) Expression that is unwelcome and so severe,
pervasive and subjectively and objectively offensive that a
student is effectively denied equal access to educational
opportunities or benefits provided by the school;

(iii) Conduct that intentionally, materially and
substantially disrupts the operations of the school or the
expressive activity of another person if that activity is
occurring in a campus space reserved for that activity
under the exclusive use or control of a particular student,
group of students, club or organization.

(g) Any person or student club or organization that
is harmed by a violation of this section or whose rights
under this section are violated shall have a cause of
action, in accordance with all of the following:

(i) The person, club or organization may seek
declaratory and injunctive relief, monetary damages,
reasonable attorney fees and costs and any other
appropriate relief;

HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
(ii) A person, club or organization prevailing
in an action under this subsection shall receive not less
than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) in damages. Nothing
in this paragraph shall be construed as limiting or
prohibiting a court from awarding damages up to the amounts
specified in or in accordance with W.S. 1-39-118(a) and
(b);

(iii) Any person, club or organization aggrieved
by a violation of this section may assert the violation as
a defense or counterclaim in any disciplinary action,
administrative proceeding or lawsuit brought against the
person, club or organization;

(iv) Nothing in this section shall be
interpreted to limit any other remedies available at law to
any person, club or organization;

(v) A person, club or organization aggrieved by
a violation of this section shall commence an action not
later than two (2) years after the day the violation
occurs. For purposes of this paragraph, each day that a
violation of this section persists or remains in effect
HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
shall constitute a new day that the cause of action has
accrued.

Section 2. W.S. 1-39-104(a) is amended to read:

1-39-104. Granting immunity from tort liability;
liability on contracts; exceptions.

(a) A governmental entity and its public employees
while acting within the scope of duties are granted
immunity from liability for any tort except as provided by
W.S. 1-39-105 through 1-39-112 and 1-39-122 through
1-39-124 1-39-125. Any immunity in actions based on a
contract entered into by a governmental entity is waived
except to the extent provided by the contract if the
contract was within the powers granted to the entity and
was properly executed and except as provided in W.S.
1-39-120(b). The claims procedures of W.S. 1-39-113 apply
to contractual claims against governmental entities.

HB0159

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0411
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0159